District of Columbia statutes.
47-4211

Imposition of accuracy-related penalty.

(a)

For purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Negligence” means a failure to make a reasonable attempt to comply with the provisions of this title or to exercise ordinary and reasonable care in the preparation of a tax return without the intent to defraud. A position with respect to an item is attributable to negligence if it lacks a reasonable basis. Negligence is indicated where:

(A)

The taxpayer fails to include on an income tax return an amount of income shown on an information return;

(B)

The taxpayer fails to make a reasonable attempt to ascertain the correctness of a deduction, credit, or exclusion on a return; or

(C)

The taxpayer fails to keep adequate books and records or to substantiate items properly.

(2)

“Gross valuation misstatement” means the reporting on any return for a tax imposed by this title of the value of a property or the adjusted basis of a property which is greater than or equal to 400%, or less than or equal to 25%, of the amount determined to be the correct amount of the valuation or adjusted basis.

(3)

(A)

“Substantial understatement of income tax” means, for a taxable year, an understatement made by taxpayer in filing an individual or estate tax return if the amount of the understatement for the taxable year exceeds the greater of:

(i)

Ten percent of the tax required to be shown on the return for the taxable year; or

(ii)

$2,000.

(B)

In the case of a taxpayer other than an individual or estate, subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be applied by substituting “$4,000” for “$2,000”.

(C)

(i)

For purposes of this section, the term “understatement” means the excess of the amount of tax required to be shown on a return less the tax shown on the return.

(ii)

The amount of the understatement under sub-subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be reduced by the portion of the understatement which is attributable to:

(I)

The tax treatment of an item by the taxpayer if there is or was substantial authority for the treatment; or

(II)

An item if:

(aa)

The relevant facts affecting the item’s tax treatment are adequately disclosed in a statement attached to the return; and

(bb)

There is a reasonable basis for the tax treatment of the item by the taxpayer.

(4)

“Substantial valuation misstatement” means the reporting on any return for a tax imposed by this title of the value of a property or the adjusted basis of a property which is greater than or equal to 200%, or less than or equal to 50%, of the amount determined to be the correct amount of the valuation or adjusted basis.

(b)

(1)

There shall be added to a tax imposed by this title an amount equal to 20% of the portion of an underpayment which is attributable to one or more of the following:

(A)

Negligence;

(B)

A substantial understatement of income tax; or

(C)

A substantial valuation misstatement.

(2)

There shall be added to the tax imposed by this title an amount equal to 40% of the portion of an underpayment which is attributable to a gross valuation misstatement.

(c)

(1)

Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to the portion of an underpayment on which a penalty is imposed under § 47-4212.

(2)

No penalty shall be imposed under subsection (b) of this section by reason of a substantial valuation misstatement or a gross valuation misstatement unless the portion of the underpayment for the taxable year attributable to the substantial valuation misstatement exceeds $5,000 ($10,000 in the case of a corporation).

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 403(b), 48 DCR 334
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(xx), 50 DCR 896

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2763 and § 47-4221.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-282, in subsec. (a)(2), substituted “greater than or equal to 400%, or less than or equal to 25%, of” for “400% or more greater or less than”; and in subsec. (a)(4), substituted “greater than or equal to 200%, or less than or equal to 50%, of” for “200% or more greater or less than”.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(ggg) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(ggg) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(fff) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(ggg) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(ggg) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).